Nebraska, session 109, LB22A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $380,628 from the Medicaid
Managed Care Excess Profit Fund and $694,972 from federal funds for FY2025-26
and (2) $774,002 from the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund and
$1,377,198 from federal funds for FY2026-27 to the Department of Health and
Human Services, for Program 348, to aid in carrying out the provisions of
Legislative Bill 22, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$380,628 Cash Funds and $694,972 federal funds for state aid, which shall only
be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2026-27 $774,002 Cash Funds and $1,377,198 federal funds for
state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
-1-